Nevada, session 83, AB179.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 608.0197 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
608.0197 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
every employer in private employment shall provide paid leave to
each employee of the employer as follows:
(a) An employee is entitled to at least 0.01923 hours of paid
leave for each hour of work performed.
(b) An employee may, as determined by the employer, obtain
paid leave by:
(1) Receiving on the first day of each benefit year the total
number of hours of paid leave that the employee is entitled to accrue
in a benefit year pursuant to paragraph (a); or
(2) Accruing over the course of a benefit year the total
number of hours of paid leave that the employee is entitled to accrue
in a benefit year pursuant to paragraph (a).
(c) Paid leave accrued pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph
(b) may carry over for each employee between his or her benefit
years of employment, except an employer may limit the amount of
paid leave for each employee carried over to a maximum of 40
hours per benefit year.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (i), an employer
shall:
(1) Compensate an employee for the paid leave available for
use by that employee at the rate of pay at which the employee is
compensated at the time such leave is taken, as calculated pursuant
to paragraph (e); and
(2) Pay such compensation on the same payday as the hours
taken are normally paid.
(e) For the purposes of determining the rate of pay at which an
employee is compensated pursuant to paragraph (d), the
compensation rate for an employee who is paid by:
(1) Salary, commission, piece rate or a method other than
hourly wage must:
(I) Be calculated by dividing the total wages of the
employee paid for the immediately preceding 90 days by the
number of hours worked during that period;
(II) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph
(III), include any bonuses agreed upon and earned by the employee;
and
(III) Not include any bonuses awarded at the sole
discretion of the employer, overtime pay, additional pay for
-
*AB179*

– 3 –
performing hazardous duties, holiday pay or tips earned by the
employee.
(2) Hourly wage must be calculated by the hourly rate the
employee is paid by the employer.
(f) An employer may limit the amount of paid leave an
employee uses to 40 hours per benefit year.
(g) An employer may set a minimum increment of paid leave,
not to exceed 4 hours, that an employee may use at any one time.
(h) An employer shall provide to each employee on each payday
an accounting of the hours of paid leave available for use by that
employee. An employer may use the system that the employer uses
to pay its employees to provide the accounting of the hours of paid
leave available for use by the employee.
(i) An employer may, but is not required to, compensate an
employee for any unused paid leave available for use by that
employee upon separation from employment, except if the employee
is rehired by the employer within 90 days after separation from that
employer and the separation from employment was not due to the
employee voluntarily leaving his or her employment, any previously
unused paid leave hours available for use by that employee must be
reinstated.
2. An employee in private employment may use paid leave
available for use by that employee as follows:
(a) An employer shall allow an employee to use paid leave
beginning on the 90th calendar day of his or her employment.
(b) An employer shall allow an employee to use paid leave for
any use, including, without limitation:
(1) Treatment of a mental or physical illness, injury or health
condition;
(2) Receiving a medical diagnosis or medical care;
(3) Receiving or participating in preventative care;
(4) Participating in caregiving; or
(5) Addressing other personal needs related to the health of
the employee.
(c) An employee may use paid leave available for use by that
employee without providing a reason to his or her employer for such
use.
(d) An employee shall, as soon as practicable, give notice to his
or her employer to use the paid leave available for use by that
employee.
3. An employer shall not:
(a) Deny an employee the right to use paid leave available for
use by that employee in accordance with the conditions of this
section;
-
*AB179*

– 4 –
(b) Require an employee to find a replacement worker as a
condition of using paid leave available for use by that employee; or
(c) Retaliate against an employee for using paid leave available
for use by that employee [.] , including, without limitation, by:
(1) Dismissing, demoting or suspending the employee;
(2) Issuing a reprimand to the employee;
(3) Transferring the employee for the purposes of
punishment;
(4) Considering, in any way, the employee’s use of paid
leave available for use by the employee in a disciplinary action
against the employee; or
(5) Taking any other adverse action against the employee
for using paid leave available for use by the employee.
4. The Labor Commissioner shall prepare a bulletin which
clearly sets forth the benefits created by this section. The Labor
Commissioner shall post the bulletin on the Internet website
maintained by the Office of Labor Commissioner, if any, and shall
require all employers to post the bulletin in a conspicuous location
in each workplace maintained by the employer. The bulletin may be
included in any printed abstract posted by the employer pursuant to
NRS 608.013.
5. An employer shall maintain a record of the receipt or accrual
and use of paid leave pursuant to this section for each employee for
a 1-year period following the entry of such information in the record
and, upon request, shall make those records available for inspection
by the Labor Commissioner.
6. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Limit or abridge any other rights, remedies or procedures
available under the law.
(b) Negate any other rights, remedies or procedures available to
an aggrieved party.
(c) Prohibit, preempt or discourage any contract or other
agreement that provides a more generous paid leave benefit or paid
time off benefit.
7. For the first 2 years of operation, an employer is not required
to comply with the provisions of this section.
8. This section does not apply to [:
(a) An employer who, pursuant to a contract, policy, collective
bargaining agreement or other agreement, provides employees with
a policy for paid leave or a policy for paid time off to all scheduled
employees at a rate of at least 0.01923 hours of paid leave per hour
of work performed; and
(b) Temporary,] temporary, seasonal or on-call employees.
9. As used in this section:
-
*AB179*

– 5 –
(a) “Benefit year” means a 365-day period used by an employer
when calculating the accrual of paid leave.
(b) “Employer” means a private employer who has 50 or more
employees in private employment in this State.
Sec. 2. Insofar as they conflict with the provisions of such an
agreement, the amendatory provisions of this act do not apply
during the current term of any contract of employment, collective
bargaining agreement or other agreement entered into before
October 1, 2025, but do apply to any extension or renewal of such
an agreement and to any agreement entered into on or after
October 1, 2025. For the purposes of this section, the term of an
agreement ends on the date provided in the agreement,
notwithstanding any provision of the agreement that it remains in
effect, in whole or in part, after that date until a successor agreement
becomes effective.
H
-
*AB179*